Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-704 Exemption of certain societies.
(a) Nothing contained in this article shall be so construed as to affect or
apply to:

(1) Grand or subordinate lodges of societies, orders,
or associations now doing business in this State that provide benefits
exclusively through local or subordinate lodges;

(2) Orders, societies, or associations that admit to
membership only persons engaged in one or more crafts or hazardous occupations,
in the same or similar lines of business, insuring only their own members and
their families, and the ladies' societies or ladies' auxiliaries to such
orders, societies, or associations;

(3) Domestic societies that limit their membership to
employees of a particular city or town, designated firm, business house or
corporation that provide for a death benefit of not more than $400 or
disability benefits of not more than $350 to any person in any one year, or
both;

(4) Domestic societies or associations of a purely
religious, charitable or benevolent description, which provide for a death
benefit of not more than $400 or for disability benefits of not more than $350
to any one person in any one year, or both; or

(5) Any association, whether a fraternal benefit
society or not; provided that:

(A) The association was organized before
1880;

(B) The association's membership consists of
active, retired, or honorably discharged members of the armed forces or sea
services of the United States, including officers or enlisted members and
regular or reserve members; and

(C) A principal purpose of the association is
to provide insurance and other benefits to its members and their dependents or
beneficiaries.

(b) Any such society or association described
in subsections (a)(3) or (4) which provides for death or disability benefits for
which benefit certificates are issued, and any such society or association
included in subsection (a)(4) which has more than one thousand members, shall
not be exempted from the provisions of this article but shall comply with all
requirements thereof.

(c) No society which, by the provisions of
this section, is exempt from the requirements of this article, except any
society described in subsection (a)(2), shall give or allow, or promise to give
or allow to any person any compensation for procuring new members.

(d) Every society which provides for benefits
in case of death or disability resulting solely from accident, and which does
not obligate itself to pay natural death or sick benefits shall have all of the
privileges and be subject to all the applicable provisions and regulations of
this article except that the provisions thereof relating to medical
examination, valuations of benefit certificates, and incontestability, shall
not apply to such society.

(e) The commissioner may require from any society
or association, by examination or otherwise, such information as will enable
the commissioner to determine whether such society or association is exempt
from the provisions of this article.

(f) Societies, exempted under the provisions
of this section, shall also be exempt from all other provisions of the
insurance laws of this State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 21, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next